Wisconsin, session 2025, AB674.
do enact as follows:AB674,1Section 1. 157.06 (15m) of the statutes is created to read:157.06 (15m) Coverage prohibited if organ is transplanted in or originates from certain countries. (a) In this subsection, “forced organ harvesting” means the removal of one or more organs from a living person, by means of coercion, abduction, deception, fraud, or abuse of power over a position of vulnerability, or from a person killed for the purpose of removal of one or more organs.(b) Subject to par. (c), no payer to which this subsection applies under par. (e) may knowingly cover a human organ transplant or posttransplant care if any of the following apply:1. The transplant operation is performed in the People’s Republic of China or in another country known to have participated in forced organ harvesting, as designated by the department under par. (d).2. The human organ to be transplanted was procured by sale or donation originating in the People’s Republic of China or in another country known to have participated in forced organ harvesting, as designated by the department under par. (d).(c) Paragraph (b) does not apply to any posttransplant service or care provided to save the life of an individual after the individual receives a human organ transplant that is prohibited under this subsection.(d) The department may designate a country whose government funds, sponsors, or otherwise facilitates forced organ harvesting as a country known to have participated in forced organ harvesting for purposes of the prohibition under par. (b).(e) This subsection applies to any disability insurance policy, as defined in s. 632.895 (1) (a), any self-insured health plan, as defined in s. 632.745 (24), and the Medical Assistance program under subch. IV of ch. 49.AB674,2Section 2. Initial applicability.(1) For policies and plans containing provisions inconsistent with this act, this act first applies to policy or plan years beginning on the effective date of this subsection, except as provided in sub. (2).(2) For policies and plans that are affected by a collective bargaining agreement containing provisions inconsistent with this act, this act first applies to policy or plan years beginning on the effective date of this subsection or on the day on which the collective bargaining agreement is newly established, extended, modified, or renewed, whichever is later.AB674,3Section 3. Effective date.(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 4th month beginning after publication. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab674 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab674 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB674 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB674 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB674: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting